Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4012
Reimbursement and compensation of
agent.

Unless
the power of attorney otherwise provides, an agent is entitled to reimbursement
of expenses reasonably incurred on behalf of the principal and to compensation
that is reasonable under the circumstances.

Laws 2012, LB1113, § 12.